dix/not-common-apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 8593
	Sdefs: 91
	Paradigms: 111

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZĈĜĤĴŜŬabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzĉĝĥĵŝŭ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acc" /> 
    <sdef n="nomiacc" /> 
    <sdef n="nomi" /> 
    <sdef n="comp" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="past" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="qnt" /> 
    <sdef n="ord" /> 
    <sdef n="obj" /> 
    <sdef n="subj" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vaux" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="gerpast" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pp2" /> 
    <sdef n="pp3" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="nom" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="subs" /> 
    <sdef n="pres" /> 
    <sdef n="pprs" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="vbdo" /> 
    <sdef n="sint" /> 
    <sdef n="unc" /> 
    <sdef n="sep" /> 
    <sdef n="pron" /> 
    <sdef n="apos" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="o__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oj</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>on</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ojn</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aj</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ajn</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nomacc">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nomacc0">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sgpl">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BBC__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="nomacc0" /> 
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="nomacc0" /> 
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="acr"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="sgpl" /> 
        <par n="nomacc" /> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adiós__ij">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="ij"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="guionet">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-</l> 
        <r>-<s n="guio"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>,</l> 
        <r>,<s n="cm"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>'</l> 
        <r>'<s n="apos"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
      <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
      <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="sent"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
      <re>[¿¡]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="lquest"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
      <re>[\(\[]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="lpar"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
      <re>[\)\]]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rpar"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adj__adjINICIAL">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jam__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tro__preadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="preadv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="where__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kaj__cnjcoo">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="after__cnjadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ke__cnjsub">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="the__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="eosto">
        <i>eost</i> 
        <par n="o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kaŝtanarbo">
        <i>kaŝtanarb</i> 
        <par n="o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="muziksintezatoro">
        <i>muziksintezator</i> 
        <par n="o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="seanco">
        <i>seanc</i> 
        <par n="o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="vokativo">
        <i>vokativ</i> 
        <par n="o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="agato">
        <i>agat</i> 
        <par n="o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kraĉaĵo">
        <i>kraĉaĵ</i> 
        <par n="o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mistika">
        <i>mistik</i> 
        <par n="a__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malsaneta">
        <i>malsanet</i> 
        <par n="a__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="estimita">
        <i>estimit</i> 
        <par n="a__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="nula">
        <i>nul</i> 
        <par n="a__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kruta">
        <i>krut</i> 
        <par n="a__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="singardema">
        <i>singardem</i> 
        <par n="a__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kaduka">
        <i>kaduk</i> 
        <par n="a__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ne tre">
        <i>ne<b/>tre</i> 
        <par n="tro__preadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="iom">
        <i>iom</i> 
        <par n="tro__preadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ciufoje pli">
        <i>ciufoje<b/>pli</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kiam ajn">
        <i>kiam<b/>ajn</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="se nur">
        <i>se<b/>nur</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="supoze ke">
        <i>supoze<b/>ke</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kiom ajn">
        <i>kiom<b/>ajn</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pro tio">
        <i>pro<b/>tio</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malsupre">
        <i>malsupr</i> 
        <par n="e__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ja">
        <i>ja</i> 
        <par n="jam__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="drame">
        <i>dram</i> 
        <par n="e__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="preskaŭ finita">
        <i>preskaŭ<b/>finita</i> 
        <par n="jam__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="de nun">
        <i>de<b/>nun</i> 
        <par n="jam__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="piedpinte">
        <i>piedpint</i> 
        <par n="e__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="en bona stato">
        <i>en<b/>bona<b/>stato</i> 
        <par n="jam__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="preskaŭ la tuta somero">
        <i>preskaŭ<b/>la<b/>tuta<b/>somero</i> 
        <par n="jam__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="laŭ prioritata ordo">
        <i>laŭ<b/>prioritata<b/>ordo</i> 
        <par n="jam__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="semajne">
        <i>semajn</i> 
        <par n="e__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="longa tempo">
        <i>longa<b/>tempo</i> 
        <par n="jam__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ne volonte">
        <i>ne<b/>volont</i> 
        <par n="e__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="erare">
        <i>erar</i> 
        <par n="e__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="senteble">
        <i>sentebl</i> 
        <par n="e__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="imagu">
        <i>imagu</i> 
        <par n="adiós__ij" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bonan matenon">
        <i>bonan<b/>matenon</i> 
        <par n="adiós__ij" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="piĉo">
        <i>piĉo</i> 
        <par n="adiós__ij" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĝis poste">
        <i>ĝis<b/>poste</i> 
        <par n="adiós__ij" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mi esperas">
        <i>mi<b/>esperas</i> 
        <par n="adiós__ij" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kia sprito">
        <i>kia<b/>sprito</i> 
        <par n="adiós__ij" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="aK">
        <i>aK</i> 
        <par n="BBC__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pK">
        <i>pK</i> 
        <par n="BBC__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="PSC">
        <i>PSC</i> 
        <par n="BBC__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="EUiA">
        <i>EUiA</i> 
        <par n="BBC__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="PSM">
        <i>PSM</i> 
        <par n="BBC__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="PSPV">
        <i>PSPV</i> 
        <par n="BBC__n" /> 
    </e>
